en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > Musical Keyboard Accessories > Musical Keyboard Stands: Column Stands; Double Braced Stands; Single Braced Stands; X-Style Stands; Z-Style Stands
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru claviatură muzicală > Suporturi pentru claviaturi: Stative tip coloană; Stative duble; Stative simple; Stative în formă de X; Stative în formă de Z
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Zenei billentyűzet kiegészítők > Zeneibillentyűzet-állványok: Oszlopállványok; Dupla merevítős állványok; Egymerevítős állványok; X-stílusú állványok; Z-stílusú állványok
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do keyboardów > Stojaki na keyboardy: Stojaki kolumnowe; Stojaki rozkładane podwójne; Stojaki rozkładane pojedyncze; Stojaki w kształcie litery X; Stojaki w kształcie litery Z
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ για συνθεσάιζερ > Βάσεις για συνθεσάιζερ: Βάσεις στήλης; Βάσεις με διπλή ενίσχυση; Βάσεις με μονή ενίσχυση; Βάσεις Τύπου Χ; Βάσεις Τύπου Ζ
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Musikkeyboard – tilbehør > Musikkeyboard – stativer: Søjlestativer; Dobbelt afstivede stativer; Enkelt afstivede stativer; X-stativer; Z-stativer
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện nhạc cụ có phím > Chân đế đàn organ: Giá đỡ dạng cột; Giá đỡ có chân thanh giằng đôi; Giá đỡ có chân thanh giằng đơn; Giá đỡ hình chữ X; Giá đỡ hình chữ Z
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till keyboards > Stativ för keyboards: Kolumnstativ; Stativ med dubbla stag; Stativ med enkelt stag; Stativ i X-stil; Stativ i Z-stil
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Muzikinių klaviatūrų priedai > Muzikinių klaviatūrų stovai: Vamzdiniai stovai; Stovai dvigubomis atramomis; Stovai viengubomis atramomis; X stiliaus stovai; Z stiliaus stovai
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за клавишни инструменти > Стойки за клавишни инструменти: Стойки за колони; Стойки с двойни скоби; Стойки с единични скоби; Х-образни стойки; Z-образни стойки
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Klávesové nástroje – příslušenství > Klávesové stojany: Sloupové stojany; Stojany s dvojitým vyztužením; Stojany s jednoduchým vyztužením; Stojany typu X; Stojany typu Y
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Dodaci za klavijature > Stalci za klavijature: Stalak u obliku stupa; Dvostruko ojačani stalci; Jednostruki X stalak; Stalci u obliku X; Stalci u obliku Z
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor keyboards > Standaards voor keyboards: Kolomstandaards; Dubbel geschoorde standaards; Enkel geschoorde standaards; X-stijlstandaards; Z-stijlstandaards
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์คีย์บอร์ด > ขาวางคีย์บอร์ดดนตรี: ขาตั้งเสา; ขาตั้งค้ำยันคู่; ขาตั้งค้ำยันเดี่ยว; ขาตั้งสไตล์ X; ขาตั้งสไตล์ Z
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Klavye Aksesuarları > Klavye Stantları: Sütun Standlar; Çift Destekli Standlar; Tek Destekli Standlar; X Tarzı Standlar; Z Tarzı Standlar
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til elektroniske orgler > Stativer til elektroniske orgler: Kolonnestativ; Stativ med doble avstivninger; Stativ med enkle avstivninger; X-Style-stativer; Z-Style-stativer
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour instruments à clavier > Supports pour instruments à clavier: Supports de colonne; Supports à double renfort; Supports à renfort simple; Supports en X; Supports en Z
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para teclados > Bases para teclados: Soportes de columna; Soportes con doble refuerzo; Soportes con un solo refuerzo; Soportes estilo X; Soportes estilo Z
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Kosketinsoittimen lisätarvikkeet > Kosketinsoittimen telineet: Pylvästelineet; Kaksihaaraiset telineet; Yksihaaraiset telineet; X-tyypin telineet; Z-tyypin telineet
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de teclado musical > Suportes de teclado musical: Suportes de colunas; Suportes duplos; Suportes individuais; Suportes em X; Suportes em Z
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 乐器键盘配件 > 键盘乐器架: 立柱乐器架; 双支撑乐器架; 单支撑乐器架; X 型乐器架; Z 型乐器架
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para teclado > Suportes para teclado: Suportes de coluna; Suportes duplos; Suportes simples; Suportes estilo X; Suportes estilo Z
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Keyboardzubehör > Keyboardständer: Säulenständer; Doppelstrebige Ständer; Einzelstrebige Ständer; X-Style-Ständer; Z-Style-Ständer
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 건반악기 부대용품 > 키보드 스탠드: 일자형 스탠드; 쌍열 스탠드; 단열 스탠드; X형 스탠드; Z형 스탠드
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для клавишных инструментов > Стойки для клавишных инструментов: Стойки-колонны; Двухрамные стойки; Однорамные стойки; X-образные стойки; Z-образные стойки
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre klávesy > Stojany na klávesy: Sĺpikové stojany; Dvojité vystužené stojany; Jednoduché vystužené stojany; Stojany do X; Stojany do Z
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za glasbene klaviature > Stojala za glasbene klaviature: Stojala za zvočnike; Dvojno ojačana stojala; Stojala z enojno oporo; Stojala z okvirjem; Stojala tipa Z
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 電子キーボード用品 > キーボードスタンド: コラムスタンド; ダブルブレーススタンド; シングルブレーススタンド; Xスタイルスタンド; Zスタイルスタンド
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 鍵盤琴配件 > 琴架: 支柱式立架; 雙層立架; 單層立架; X 字型立架; Z 字型立架
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori per tastiera > Leggii per tastiere: Supporti a colonna; Supporti con rinforzo doppio; Supporti con rinforzo singolo; Supporti a X; Supporti a Z